District of Columbia statutes.
31-5011

Delegation of functions by Mayor.

The Mayor is authorized to delegate any of the functions vested in him by this chapter.

Aug. 1, 1968, 82 Stat. 572, Pub. L. 90-448, title XII, § 1212
1981 Ed., § 35-1811.
1973 Ed., § 35-1711.

Delegation of functions: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-5002.

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-5002.

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.